Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0867.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the judiciary for the
fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds:
JUDICIARY
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated exempted positions 687.5
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 393,258,400
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 1,902,300
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 391,356,100
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 7,323,000
Special revenue funds:
Total private revenues 1,912,900
Total other state restricted revenues 100,887,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 281,233,000
Sec. 102. SUPREME COURT
Full-time equated exempted positions 329.0
Community dispute resolution--FTEs 4.0 $ 4,352,900
Foster care review board--FTEs 10.0 1,482,600
Jail reform advisory support--FTE 1.0 163,400
Judicial information systems--FTEs 113.0 23,410,100
Judicial institute--FTEs 17.0 2,968,600
Justice for all--FTEs 2.0 1,547,000
Michigan legal help 1,000,000
Next generation Michigan court system 4,116,000
Other federal grants 275,100
Problem-solving courts--FTEs 3.0 21,137,200
State court administrative office--FTEs 83.0 15,994,000
Supreme court administration--FTEs 96.0 17,059,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 93,506,000
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from department of corrections 52,300
IDG from department of state police 1,500,000
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


IDG from department of state police, Michigan
justice training fund 100,000
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 1,652,300
Federal revenues:
DOJ, drug court training and evaluation 300,000
DOT, National Highway Traffic Safety
Administration 2,358,700
Federal funds 275,100
HHS, access and visitation grant 508,000
HHS, children's justice grant 259,800
HHS, court improvement project 1,019,000
HHS, safe access for victims economic security
grant 420,000
HHS, state opioid response grant 352,200
HHS, title IV-D child support program 912,800
HHS, title IV-E foster care program 333,600
Special revenue funds:
Interest on lawyers' trust accounts 414,400
Private funds 501,100
State justice institute 529,000
Community dispute resolution fund 2,620,000
Court fee fund 2,007,600
Court of appeals filing/motion fees 1,450,000
Drug treatment court fund 1,920,500
Justice system fund 657,100
Law exam fees 808,700
Miscellaneous revenue 249,400
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


State court fund 422,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 73,533,900
Sec. 103. COURT OF APPEALS
Full-time equated exempted positions 180.0
Court of appeals operations--FTEs 180.0 $ 28,391,900
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 28,391,900
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 28,391,900
Sec. 104. BRANCHWIDE APPROPRIATIONS
Full-time equated exempted positions 6.0
Branchwide appropriations--FTEs 6.0 $ 10,398,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,398,400
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 10,398,400
Sec. 105. JUSTICES' AND JUDGES' COMPENSATION
Judges' positions--591.0 justices and judges
Supreme court justices' salaries--7.0 justices $ 1,270,500
Circuit court judges' state base salaries--
223.0 judges 32,563,500
Circuit court judicial salary standardization 10,196,800
Court of appeals judges' salaries--25.0 judges 5,188,500
District court judges' state base salaries--
232.0 judges 33,877,700
District court judicial salary standardization 10,608,600
Probate court judges' state base salaries--
104.0 judges 15,060,600
Probate court judicial salary standardization 4,715,300
Judges' retirement system defined contributions 9,734,600
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


OASI, Social Security 8,661,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 131,877,700
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Court fee fund 3,119,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 128,758,400
Sec. 106. JUDICIAL AGENCIES
Full-time equated exempted positions 17.0
Judicial tenure commission--FTEs 17.0 $ 2,995,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,995,100
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 2,995,100
Sec. 107. INDIGENT DEFENSE - CRIMINAL
Full-time equated exempted positions 129.5
Appellate public defender program--FTEs 97.0 $ 18,224,900
Juvenile life resentencing--FTEs 32.5 5,621,200
Michigan appellate assigned counsel system
roster attorney compensation grants 4,408,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 28,254,200
Appropriated from:
IDG from department of state police 250,000
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 250,000
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 583,800
Special revenue funds:
Interest on lawyers' trust accounts 88,400
Michigan justice fund 380,000
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


Miscellaneous revenue 172,400
State general fund/general purpose $ 26,779,600
Sec. 108. INDIGENT CIVIL LEGAL ASSISTANCE
Indigent civil legal assistance $ 7,937,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 7,937,000
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
State court fund 7,937,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 109. TRIAL COURT OPERATIONS
Full-time equated exempted positions 26.0
Court equity fund reimbursements $ 60,815,700
Drug case-flow program 250,000
Drunk driving case-flow program 3,300,000
Judicial technology improvement fund 4,815,000
Juror compensation reimbursement--FTE 1.0 6,619,900
Statewide e-file system--FTEs 25.0 12,097,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 87,898,100
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Court equity fund 50,440,000
Drug case information management fund 250,000
Drunk driving case-flow assistance fund 3,300,000
Judicial electronic filing fund 12,097,500
Judicial technology improvement fund 4,815,000
Juror compensation fund 6,619,900
State general fund/general purpose $ 10,375,700
Sec. 110. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


Accelerated resentencing hearings $ 2,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,000,000
Appropriated from:
Juror compensation fund 2,000,000
Total other state restricted revenues 2,000,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 0

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is
$382,120,200.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state
sources to be paid to local units of government is $169,486,400.00.
The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from
which spending to local units of government will occur:
JUDICIARY
SUPREME COURT
Judicial information services $ 17,319,100
Next generation Michigan court system 4,116,000
Problem-solving courts 17,856,000
State court administrative office 200,000
JUSTICES' AND JUDGES' COMPENSATION
Circuit court judicial salary standardization $ 10,196,800
District court judicial salary standardization 10,608,600
OASI, Social Security 1,515,900
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


Probate court judges' state base salaries 15,060,600
Probate court judicial salary standardization 4,715,300
TRIAL COURT OPERATIONS
Court equity fund reimbursements $ 60,815,700
Drug case-flow program 250,000
Drunk driving case-flow program 3,300,000
Judicial technology improvement fund 4,815,000
Juror compensation reimbursement 6,619,900
Statewide e-file system 12,097,500
TOTAL $ 169,486,400
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "DOJ" means the United States Department of Justice.
(b) "DOT" means the United States Department of
Transportation.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equated exempted positions.
(d) "HHS" means the United States Department of Health and
Human Services.
(e) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant.
(f) "OASI" means old age survivor's insurance.
(g) "Restorative justice" means a process that is guided by
neutral, trained, and experienced facilitators to provide a safe
space for individuals to address wrongdoing or harm with each
other, repair relationships, and offer a positive path moving
forward.
(h) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house
appropriations subcommittees on corrections and judiciary, the
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy
offices, and the state budget office.
(i) "Title IV-D" means the part of the federal social security
act, 42 USC 301 to 1397mm, pertaining to the child support
enforcement program.
(j) "Title IV-E" means the part of the federal social security
act, 42 USC 301 to 1397mm, pertaining to the foster care program.
Sec. 204. The judicial branch shall use the internet to
fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each
report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each
required report on the judicial branch's website not later than the
applicable due date. In addition, the judicial branch shall
maintain on its website reports posted in previous fiscal years.
The judicial branch shall also transmit all required reports under
this part to the standard report recipients and any other required
recipients by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


comparable quality.
Sec. 206. The state court administrative office shall prepare
a report on travel expenses not later than January 1. The report
must list all travel by judicial branch employees outside this
state in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in
part with funds appropriated in the judicial branch's budget. The
state court administrative office shall submit the report to the
standard report recipients and to the senate and house
appropriations committees. The report must include all of the
following information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related expenses of each
travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, and other revenues.
Sec. 207. Not later than December 15, the judicial branch
shall cooperate with the state budget office to prepare and submit
a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general
purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal
year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general
fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major judicial program
or program areas. The state budget office shall submit the report
to the standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the
senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 208. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the judicial
branch shall maintain a searchable website accessible by the public
at no cost that posts all of the expenditures made by the judicial
branch within a fiscal year. A post must include the purpose for
the expenditure. The judicial branch shall not provide financial
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


information on the public website that would violate a federal or
state law, rule, regulation, or guideline that establishes privacy
or security standards applicable to that financial information.
Sec. 209. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the judicial branch shall
cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report
on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate
and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 210. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $9,414,300.00 for the judicial branch.
From this amount, total appropriations for pension-related legacy
costs for the judicial branch are estimated at $9,414,300.00. Total
appropriations for retiree health care legacy costs for the
judicial branch are estimated at $0.00.
Sec. 211. The judicial branch shall not take disciplinary
action against an employee of the judicial branch because the
employee communicates with a member of the legislature or
legislative staff, unless the communication is prohibited by law
and the judicial branch is exercising its authority as provided by
law.
Sec. 212. The judicial branch shall receive and retain copies
of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The judicial
branch shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-
term and long-term retention of records. The judicial branch may
electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


by federal and state guidelines.
Sec. 213. To the extent possible, the judicial branch shall
not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing
authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are
exhausted.
Sec. 214. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, the judicial branch shall
submit an annual report that summarizes all work project accounts.
The report must include all of the following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
Sec. 215. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 to an entity in the
judicial branch must not be expended or transferred to another
account without written approval of the authorized agent of the
judicial entity. If the authorized agent of the judicial entity
notifies the state budget director of its approval of an
expenditure or transfer, the state budget director shall
immediately make the expenditure or transfer. The authorized
judicial entity agent shall be designated by the chief justice of
the supreme court.
(2) Funds appropriated to the judicial branch must not be
expended by a component in the judicial branch without the approval
of the supreme court.
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


Sec. 217. Not later than November 15, the judicial branch
shall disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other
third-party funds received by the judicial branch in the previous
fiscal year. The report must include the amount of funding
received, the specific source of funding received, the purpose for
which funding was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds.
The report must be submitted to the standard report recipients and
to the chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations
committees.
Sec. 218. The chief justice shall take steps to ensure that
all state fiscal recovery funds received under the American rescue
plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, by the judicial branch are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal
recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026
are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026
and any subsequent financial close out period.

JUDICIAL BRANCH
Sec. 301. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
judicial branch, $711,900.00 is allocated for circuit court
reimbursement under section 3 of 1978 PA 16, MCL 800.453, and for
costs associated with the court of claims.
Sec. 302. A member of the legislature may request a report or
data from the data collected in the judicial data warehouse. The
report must be made available to the public upon request, unless
disclosure is prohibited by court order or state or federal law. If
data is provided under this section, the data must be public and
nonidentifying information, as determined by the state court
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


administrative office. As used in this section, "nonidentifying
information" means information that does not include personal
information that, if released, would be considered invasion of
privacy.
Sec. 303. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
community dispute resolution, community dispute resolution centers
shall provide dispute resolution services specified in the
community dispute resolution act, 1988 PA 260, MCL 691.1551 to
691.1564, help reduce suspensions and truancy, and improve school
environment. The funds appropriated in part 1 for community dispute
resolution may be used to develop or expand juvenile diversion
services in coordination with local prosecutors.
(2) Of the amount appropriated for community dispute
resolution, $768,800.00 may be used for restorative justice
purposes.
Sec. 304. If funds in the court fee fund are insufficient to
pay judges' compensation, the difference between the appropriated
amount from that fund for judges' compensation and the actual
amount available after the amount appropriated for trial court
reimbursement is made is appropriated from the state general fund
for judges' compensation. If an appropriation from the state
general fund is necessary under this section, not later than 14
days after the appropriation, the state court administrative office
shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and the
senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 305. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the state
court administrative office shall submit a report on drug
treatment, mental health, and veterans court programs in this state
not later than March 1. The report must include all of the
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


following information for each individual court, by program:
(a) The number of each type of program.
(b) The number of program participants.
(c) The impact of the programs on offender criminal
involvement and recidivism.
(d) An accounting of previous fiscal year expenditures,
including grant amounts requested, grant amounts awarded, and grant
amounts expended.
Sec. 306. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for problem-
solving courts must be administered by the state court
administrative office to operate problem-solving court programs. A
problem-solving court shall use all available county and state
personnel involved in the disposition of cases, including, but not
limited to, parole and probation agents, prosecuting attorneys,
defense attorneys, and community corrections providers. The funds
may be used in connection with other federal, state, and local
funding sources.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the chief justice
shall allocate sufficient funds for the Michigan judicial institute
to provide in-state training for those identified in subsection (1)
and new problem-solving court judges.
(3) The state court administrative office may prioritize
funding for courts that have a higher number of filed substance use
disorder cases.
(4) To assist the department of corrections and avoid prison
bed space growth for nonviolent offenders, the judicial branch
shall receive $1,500,000.00 in Byrne formula grant funding through
an interdepartmental grant from the department of state police to
be used to support problem-solving court costs consistent with
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


Byrne grant program criteria.
(5) Of the amount appropriated in part 1 for problem-solving
courts, $768,800.00 may be used for restorative justice purposes.
(6) A problem-solving court may include, but is not limited
to, any of the following:
(a) Drug treatment courts under chapter 10A of the revised
judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.1060 to 600.1088.
(b) Mental health courts under chapter 10B of the revised
judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.1090 to 600.1099a.
(c) Juvenile mental health courts under chapter 10C of the
revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.1099b to
600.1099m.
(d) Family treatment courts under chapter 10D of the revised
judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.1099aa to 600.1099ll.
(e) Veterans treatment courts under chapter 12 of the revised
judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.1200 to 600.1212.
Sec. 308. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the judicial
branch shall support a statewide legal self-help internet website
and local nonprofit self-help centers that use the statewide
website to provide assistance to individuals who represent
themselves in civil legal proceedings. The state court
administrative office shall summarize the costs to maintain the
website, provide statistics on the number of individuals who visit
the website, and provide information on content usage, form
completion, and user feedback not later than March 1 for the
previous fiscal year.
Sec. 309. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the state
court administrative office shall submit a report on the statewide
judicial case management system not later than March 1. The report
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


must provide a status update on development and implementation of
the statewide judicial case management system and must include all
appropriation and expenditure data for all previous and the current
fiscal years.
Sec. 310. The state court administrative office shall not
impose local user fees or collect local user fees from trial courts
that are using the statewide judicial case management system.
Sec. 311. (1) If Byrne formula grant funding is awarded to the
state appellate defender office in excess of the amount
appropriated in part 1, the state appellate defender office may
receive and expend not more than $250,000.00 of Byrne formula grant
funds as an interdepartmental grant from the department of state
police.
(2) If the state appellate defender office receives federal
grant funding from the United States Department of Justice in
excess of the amount appropriated in part 1, the state appellate
defender office may receive and expend not more than $300,000.00 in
federal grant funds.
Sec. 313. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the state
appellate defender office shall operate the program to ensure this
state's compliance with Montgomery v Louisiana, 577 US 190 (2016),
People v Parks, 510 Mich 225 (2022), People v Stovall, 510 Mich 301
(2022), People v Poole, 349 Mich App 594 (2024), People v
Czarnecki, Mich (2025), and People v Taylor, Mich (2025). The
purpose of the program is to ensure competent, resourced, and
supervised counsel in cases that involve resentencing individuals
who are serving a life sentence for an offense committed when the
individuals were 20 years of age or younger.
(2) The state appellate defender office shall submit a report
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


not later than March 1 on the number of cases investigated and
prepared by the state appellate defender office under subsection
(1). The report must include a calculation of the hours spent and
the incremental costs associated with the investigation and robust
examination of each case.
Sec. 314. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan
appellate assigned counsel system roster attorney compensation
grants must be deposited into the restricted Michigan appellate
assigned counsel system attorney compensation fund created in
subsection (2).
(2) The Michigan appellate assigned counsel system attorney
compensation fund is created in the state treasury. The state
treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for
deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the
investment of the fund and credit to the fund interest and earnings
from fund investments. Unexpended funds at the close of the fiscal
year must remain in the fund and shall not lapse to the general
fund. The judicial branch shall be the administrator of the fund
for auditing purposes. The judicial branch shall expend money from
the fund to provide payments to indigent defense systems as
provided under section 8a of the appellate defender act, 1978 PA
620, MCL 780.718a.
(3) All funds available in the Michigan appellate assigned
counsel system attorney compensation fund are appropriated and
available for expenditure as provided by law.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 401. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
accelerated resentencing hearings, the state appellate defender
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es


office may hire up to 4.0 limited-term employees to support and
accelerate the agency's juvenile lifer resentencing program, as
described in section 313.
(2) The unexpended appropriations in part 1 for accelerated
resentencing hearings are designated as a work project
appropriation. Any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse
at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for
expenditure for the project under this section until the project
has been completed. The following is in compliance with section
451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to supplement and accelerate
juvenile lifer resentencing hearings as required by law.
(b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state
resources and contracts.
(c) The total estimated completion cost of the project is
$2,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date for the work project is
September 30, 2030.
Final Page
SCS S06110'26 (S-1) ku92es